Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4803
Administrator; duties.

The administrator shall serve as the farm mediation program coordinator and shall be responsible for placing into effect and implementing the Farm Mediation Act.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 3.